Nevada, session 83, SB147.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. As used in sections 1 to 10, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 2. “Advisory Committee” means the Advisory Committee
on Regional Planning for Economic Resiliency established pursuant
to section 7 of this act.
Sec. 3. “Commission” means the Regional Transportation
Commission of Southern Nevada.
Sec. 4. “Program” means the Southern Nevada Regional
Planning for Economic Resiliency Pilot Program created by section
8 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Project” means any structure, facility, undertaking or
system which a local government is authorized to acquire, improve,
equip, maintain or operate, which may consist of all kinds of
personal and real property.
Sec. 6. “Region” means Clark County, Nevada.
Sec. 7. 1. The Commission shall establish the Advisory
Committee on Regional Planning for Economic Resiliency to assist
the Commission in carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 10,
inclusive, of this act.
2. The Commission shall appoint at least nine members to the
Advisory Committee which must be comprised of various
stakeholders in the region who must have experience in regional
planning, economic development or redevelopment, workforce
development, infrastructure development or transit services.
3. The members of the Advisory Committee must include,
without limitation:
(a) One member from the regional development authority which
has entered into a contract with the Office of Economic
Development to serve the region; and
(b) At least one member each from the following local
governments:
(1) The City of Las Vegas;
(2) The City of Henderson;
(3) The City of North Las Vegas;
(4) Boulder City;
(5) The City of Mesquite; and
-
*SB147_R2*

– 3 –
(6) Clark County.
4. Each member of the Advisory Committee serves a term of 2
years.
5. The Advisory Committee shall elect a Chair and Vice Chair
from among its members at the first meeting of the Advisory
Committee.
6. A majority of the members of the Advisory Committee
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority
of those members present at any meeting is sufficient for any
official action taken by the Advisory Committee.
7. Each member of the Advisory Committee serves without
compensation and is not entitled to receive a per diem allowance or
travel expenses.
Sec. 8. 1. The Southern Nevada Regional Planning for
Economic Resiliency Pilot Program is hereby created as a pilot
program to support and sustain the economic resiliency of the region
by:
(a) Evaluating the current regional planning process and the
existing and future priorities and needs in the region, with a focus on
infrastructure projects, transit services and economic development
and redevelopment projects; and
(b) Identifying sources of federal, state and other money that
will support the continued infrastructure, transit and economic needs
of the growing population in the region.
2. The Commission shall, with advice from the Advisory
Committee, oversee the Program.
Sec. 9. 1. The Commission shall conduct the Program to
study and perform community outreach on issues relating to
regional planning for economic development and resiliency in the
region with a focus on the following population centers:
(a) The City of Las Vegas;
(b) The City of Henderson;
(c) The City of North Las Vegas;
(d) Boulder City;
(e) The City of Mesquite; and
(f) Any other urbanized section of the Las Vegas Valley.
2. The Program conducted pursuant to subsection 1 must,
without limitation:
(a) Identify existing, planned and proposed areas for economic
development, redevelopment and diversification, such as
redevelopment areas, existing underserved neighborhoods with
opportunities for reinvestment, opportunity zones, job creation
zones, Southern Nevada Strong opportunity sites, areas identified in
the Comprehensive Economic Development Strategy for Southern
Nevada developed by the Las Vegas Global Economic Alliance,
-
*SB147_R2*

– 4 –
innovation districts, large-scale industrial areas, any activity centers
identified by Southern Nevada Strong, parcels with transit-oriented
development or mixed-use zoning, activity centers identified by the
Brookings Institution and any areas with major development;
(b) Review existing plans for the population centers identified in
subsection 1 for capital improvements and other planning efforts
and, based on such plans, identify economic development centers
with planned infrastructure projects and transit services, which may
be at any stage in the planning process, and any unfunded needs
with regards to those planned infrastructure projects and transit
services;
(c) Develop and implement a community outreach plan to:
(1) Increase community support of regional planning;
(2) Obtain community input on a list of economic
development and redevelopment projects recommended by the
Advisory Committee to be regionally significant and which support
community goals, such as attracting target industries, diversifying
the economy or locating transit, jobs and housing within the same
location; and
(3) Garner community input regarding infrastructure projects
and transit services that are regionally significant and necessary to
support the list of economic development and redevelopment
projects and support the region overall;
(d) Develop planning-level cost estimates that include transit,
capital, operations and maintenance and infrastructure design,
construction and maintenance;
(e) Complete a high-level evaluation of the benefits of
infrastructure projects and transit services that support the economic
development and redevelopment priorities identified in the
Comprehensive Economic Development Strategy for Southern
Nevada and by Southern Nevada Strong;
(f) Develop additional criteria to evaluate and prioritize
economic development and redevelopment projects in the region;
(g) Develop packages of infrastructure projects and transit
services, which identify for each package, project and service, the
costs and benefits, current stage of development, resources already
committed and any additional money needed;
(h) Develop a prioritized list of infrastructure projects and transit
services that support the economic development and redevelopment
centers and projects that are regionally significant;
(i) Identify packages of economic development and
redevelopment projects that could be submitted for federal grants
and, if feasible, initiate an application for grants for any such
package; and
-
*SB147_R2*

– 5 –
(j) Evaluate the regional planning development process and
determine the steps, roles and resources needed to continue regional
coordination.
Sec. 10. On or before June 30, 2027:
1. The Commission shall prepare:
(a) A regional infrastructure plan for economic growth and
resiliency in the region, which must identify, without limitation:
(1) Infrastructure projects and transit services that support
access to existing, planned and proposed economic development and
redevelopment centers and projects that are regionally significant;
and
(2) Potential federal, state and other resources that may be
available to support the projects and services identified pursuant to
subparagraph (1); and
(b) A written report describing the activities, findings,
conclusions and recommendations of the Advisory Committee.
2. The Commission shall submit a copy of the plan and report
prepared pursuant to subsection 1 to the Director of the Legislature
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Government Affairs.
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Regional Transportation Commission of
Southern Nevada the sum of $500,000 to establish and implement
the Southern Nevada Regional Planning for Economic Resiliency
Pilot Program created by section 8 of this act and for a staff member
or contractor to assist the Commission and the Advisory Committee
on Regional Planning for Economic Resiliency created by section 7
of this act in carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 10,
inclusive, of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 12. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, and
expires by limitation on June 30, 2027.
H
-
*SB147_R2*